Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1085
Plant, defined.

Plant shall mean any plant, plant product, plant part, or reproductive or propagative part of a plant, plant product, or plant part including, but not limited to, trees, shrubs, vines, forage and cereal plants, fruit, seeds, grain, wood, or lumber. This shall include all growing media, packing material, or containers associated with the plants, plant parts, or plant products named in this section.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 14.